Utah statutes.
53A-15-304.5.   Special education assessments for children in the custody of
the Division of Child and Family Services.
Each school district shall provide an initial special education assessment for
children who enter the custody of the Division of Child and Family Services,
upon request by that division, for children whose school records indicate that
they may have disabilities requiring special education services.  The
assessment shall be conducted within 30 days of the request by the Division of
Child and Family Services.
